District of Columbia statutes.
6-641.02

Zoning regulations — Purpose.

Zoning maps and regulations, and amendments thereto, shall not be inconsistent with the comprehensive plan for the national capital, and zoning regulations shall be designed to lessen congestion in the street, to secure safety from fire, panic, and other dangers, to promote health and the general welfare, to provide adequate light and air, to prevent the undue concentration of population and the overcrowding of land, and to promote such distribution of population and of the uses of land as would tend to create conditions favorable to health, safety, transportation, prosperity, protection of property, civic activity, and recreational, educational, and cultural opportunities, and as would tend to further economy and efficiency in the supply of public services. Such regulations shall be made with reasonable consideration, among other things, of the character of the respective districts and their suitability for the uses provided in the regulations, and with a view to encouraging stability of districts and of land values therein.

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 797, ch. 534, § 2
Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 810, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 492(b)(1)
National Capital Planning Commission, comprehensive plan for national capital, see § 2-1003.
1981 Ed., § 5-414.
1973 Ed., § 5-414.
Zoning Review Task Force: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 6-641.01.